Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 36 College of Pharmacy [Repealed.]

16-36-1, 16-36-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1073, §§ 1, 3; G.L. 1956, §§

16-36-1

, 16-36-2; Repealed by P.L. 1980, ch. 395, § 1. For provisions concerning establishment and management of the college of pharmacy fund, see §§

16-32-25

,

16-32-26

.